Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1922.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [604.50] ACTIONS BY GOVERNMENT ENTITIES; AWARD OF COSTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Title. new text end new text begin This section may be cited as the "Anti-Lawfare Law." new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Government entity" means: new text end new text begin (1) a state agency as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 17; or new text end new text begin (2) a municipality, as defined in section 466.01, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (c) "Person" does not include a government entity. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Award of costs. new text end new text begin A government entity that commenced an action against a person and did not prevail is liable to the person for all costs, disbursements, and fees, including attorney fees, that the person incurred related to their defense. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Other remedies. new text end new text begin This section does not limit any other available remedies. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to actions commenced on or after that date. new text end